Utah statutes.
63C-11-310.   Contests.

(1)  Except as provided in Section 63C-11-317, a licensee may not participate in an unarmed combat contest within a predetermined time after another unarmed combat contest, as prescribed in rules made by the commission.

(2)  During the period of time beginning 60 minutes before the beginning of a contest, the promoter shall demonstrate the promoter's compliance with the commission's security requirements to all commission members present at the contest.

(3)  The commission shall establish fees in accordance with Section 63J-1-504 to be paid by a promoter for the conduct of each contest or event composed of multiple contests conducted under this chapter.

